Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 3
OFFICERS

28-3-301. State staff - number and grades.

The state headquarters shall contain a staff and detachment and shall be divided into a department of the Army and a department of the Air Force. Each department shall be commanded by an officer of the Colorado National Guard. Said officer may be appointed by the governor to the rank of brigadier general or to such higher rank in which he or she may be federally recognized. The number and grades of all other officers and enlisted men and women in the state staff and detachment shall be as prescribed by federal or state law, but, in case of war, invasion, insurrection, riot, or imminent danger of any such emergency, the governor may temporarily increase such forces to meet such emergency, and retired officers who are physically qualified may be assigned to such duty.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 615, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-11.

L. 58:

p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-11.

L. 71:

p. 1045, § 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 595, § 30, effective May 24.

28-3-302. Appointment of officers.

The officers of the state staff and detachment shall be selected and appointed by the adjutant general and commissioned by the governor if such appointees at the time of appointment shall have been, for at least three years immediately prior to appointment, a regularly commissioned officer of the National Guard; except that, where there is no qualified person in the National Guard available to fill a vacancy on the staff, an appointment may be made by the adjutant general if the individual so appointed qualifies for a commission pursuant to section 28-3-303.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 615, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-12.

28-3-303. Qualifications of officers.

Officers of the National Guard shall not be commissioned as such unless they have been selected from the classes of persons having the qualifications prescribed by federal law and have taken and subscribed to the oath of office prescribed by congress.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 615, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-13.

28-3-304. Commissions - examinations - assignments.

Any person appointed, promoted, and commissioned on or after April 14, 1955, as an officer of the National Guard shall successively pass such examinations and tests as to his or her physical, moral, and professional fitness as are prescribed by federal law. Officers shall be commissioned by the governor, and the commissions shall designate the armed service, staff corps, or department in which they are appointed. They will be assigned to duty within each organization by the immediate commander thereof.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 615, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-14.

L. 71:

p. 1046, § 4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 596, § 31, effective May 24.

28-3-305. Officers' duties - administer oaths.

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed in this part 3, all officers of the National Guard shall have the same duties as officers of similar rank and position in the United States Army or the United States Air Force, as the case may be, insofar as may be authorized by federal law. They are authorized to administer oaths in all matters connected with the service.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 616, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-15.

Cross references:

For officers' powers to perform notarial acts, see § 24-12-104.

28-3-306. Federal duty as continuous service.

Service by any person in the United States volunteers or in any of the armed forces of the United States in time of war, insurrection, or rebellion shall be considered as continuous service in the National Guard for all purposes regarding privileges and exemptions provided by law for members of the National Guard, by enlistment or commission, but the continuous service for an officer shall include only the time he or she was commissioned as such.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 616, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-16.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 596, § 32, effective May 24.

28-3-307. Supplies - indemnity bonds - depots.

Arms, ammunition, equipment, and stores shall be issued to the proper officers of each organization upon requisition as prescribed by federal law. The governor may require of the accountable officers such bonds as he or she deems necessary for securing the care and safety of property so issued and shall allow them sufficient money to insure such property against fire when so required by the federal government. He or she may also allow them sufficient money to establish and maintain depots approved by him or her and to pay for transportation, handling, and care of such property, which allowance shall be paid out of the moneys appropriated or designated for the purchase of supplies for the National Guard. The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall obtain and pay for, out of the military fund, an adequate indemnity bond covering all of the officers of the National Guard responsible for moneys and military property.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 616, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-17.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 596, § 33, effective May 24.

28-3-308. Resignation of officers.

Commissioned officers and warrant officers may resign in such manner and under such circumstances as may be provided by federal laws or regulations.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 616, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-18.

28-3-309. Officer's fitness - vacation of commissions.

The moral character, capacity, and general fitness for the service of any National Guard officer may be determined by an efficiency board as provided by federal law. Commissions or warrants of officers of the National Guard may be vacated upon resignation, absence without leave for three months, the recommendation of an efficiency board pursuant to sentence of a court-martial, permanent removal from the state, termination of federal recognition, or transfer to another reserve component.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 616, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-19.

L. 71:

p. 1046, § 5.

28-3-310. Disbandment - surplus officers - disposition.

Officers of the National Guard rendered surplus by the disbandment of their organization shall be disposed of as provided by federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 617, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-20.

28-3-311. Officers - inactive status - procedure.

Officers may, upon their own application, be placed in the inactive National Guard as may be authorized by federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 617, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-21.

28-3-312. Retirement of officers.

Officers may voluntarily retire and be placed on the retirement list if they have qualified for such retirement under the provisions of federal law. Officers may be involuntarily retired and placed on the retirement list if under federal law such retirement becomes mandatory.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 617, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-22.

28-3-313. Termination of commission - recall.

Commissions of National Guard officers shall be terminated as provided by federal law, but, in time of war or other declared emergency, any officer who reaches retirement age may, in the discretion of the commander in chief, on the recommendation of the adjutant general, be continued in the active service of the state defense force in his or her then grade and assignment for the duration of the war or emergency and for six months thereafter.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 617, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-23.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1016, § 9, effective May 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 596, § 34, effective May 24.

28-3-314. Roll of retired officers.

Any commissioned officer of the National Guard who resigns or is retired and who has served as such officer for a period of not less than fifteen years, and any commissioned officer of the National Guard who has been honorably discharged from any of the armed forces of the United States after serving therein for a period of ninety days or more during any war and who has served as such officer of the National Guard for a period of not less than ten years, and any commissioned officer of the National Guard who becomes disabled and thereby incapable of performing the duties of his or her office shall, upon retirement, have his or her name placed on a roll in the office of the adjutant general to be known as the "roll of retired officers" and is thereby entitled to wear, when not in conflict with federal law, on state or other occasions of ceremony, the uniform of the rank last held by him or her.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 617, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-24.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 597, § 35, effective May 24.

28-3-315. Retired officers - warrant officers - limited assignments.

The commander in chief may assign officers and warrant officers on the retired list to state active duty in recruiting, to serve upon courts-martial, courts of inquiry and board, to staff duty not involving service with troops, to be in charge of a military reservation left temporarily without officers, or to such other duties as the adjutant general may designate. Such officers and warrant officers while so assigned shall receive the full pay and allowances of their grades at time of retirement or may serve in a volunteer unpaid status.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 618, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-25.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 586, § 8, effective May 24.

28-3-316. Brevet commissions.

General and field officers of the National Guard who have, after twenty-five years' service, resigned or retired may, in the discretion of the commander in chief, on the recommendation of the adjutant general, be commissioned by brevet in the next higher grade than that held by them at the time of their resignation or retirement, but not above the grade of major general. Brevet rank shall be considered strictly honorary and shall confer no privilege of precedence or command nor pay any emoluments. Brevet officers may wear the uniform of their brevet rank on occasions of ceremony.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 618, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-26.